Hawaii statutes.
§453-8 Revocation, limitation, suspension,
or denial of licenses. (a) In addition to any other actions authorized by
law, any license to practice medicine and surgery may be revoked, limited, or
suspended by the board at any time in a proceeding before the board, or may be
denied, for any cause authorized by law, including but not limited to the
following:

(1) Procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a
criminal abortion;

(2) Employing any person to solicit patients for
one's self;

(3) Engaging in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising, including but not limited to:

(A) Making excessive claims of expertise in
one or more medical specialty fields;

(B) Assuring a permanent cure for an
incurable disease; or

(C) Making any untruthful and improbable
statement in advertising one's medical or surgical practice or business;

(4) Being habituated to the excessive use of drugs or
alcohol; or being addicted to, dependent on, or a habitual user of a narcotic,
barbiturate, amphetamine, hallucinogen, or other drug having similar effects;

(5) Practicing medicine while the ability to practice
is impaired by alcohol, drugs, physical disability, or mental instability;

(6) Procuring a license through fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit, or knowingly permitting an unlicensed person to
perform activities requiring a license;

(7) Professional misconduct, hazardous negligence
causing bodily injury to another, or manifest incapacity in the practice of
medicine or surgery;

(8) Incompetence or multiple instances of negligence,
including but not limited to the consistent use of medical service, which is
inappropriate or unnecessary;

(9) Conduct or practice contrary to recognized
standards of ethics of the medical profession as adopted by the Hawaii Medical
Association, the American Medical Association, the Hawaii Association of
Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons, or the American Osteopathic Association;

(10) Violation of the conditions or limitations upon
which a limited or temporary license is issued;

(11) Revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary
action by another state or federal agency of a license, certificate, or medical
privilege;

(12) Conviction, whether by nolo contendere or
otherwise, of a penal offense substantially related to the qualifications,
functions, or duties of a physician or osteopathic physician, notwithstanding
any statutory provision to the contrary;

(13) Violation of chapter 329, the uniform controlled
substances act, or any rule adopted thereunder except as provided in section 329-122;

(14) Failure to report to the board, in writing, any
disciplinary decision issued against the licensee or the applicant in another
jurisdiction within thirty days after the disciplinary decision is issued; or

(15) Submitting to or filing with the board any
notice, statement, or other document required under this chapter, which is
false or untrue or contains any material misstatement or omission of fact.

(b) If disciplinary action related to the
practice of medicine has been taken against the applicant by another state or
federal agency, or if the applicant reveals a physical or mental condition that
would constitute a violation under this section, then the board may impose one
or more of the following requirements as a condition for licensure:

(1) Physical and mental evaluation of the applicant
by a licensed physician or osteopathic physician approved by the board;

(2) Probation, including conditions of probation as
requiring observation of the licensee by an appropriate group or society of
licensed physicians, osteopathic physicians, or surgeons;

(3) Limitation of the license by restricting the
fields of practice in which the licensee may engage;

(4) Further education or training or proof of
performance competency; and

(5) Limitation of the medical practice of the
licensee in any reasonable manner to assure the safety and welfare of the
consuming public.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the board may deny a license to any applicant who has been
disciplined by another state or federal agency. Any final order of discipline
taken pursuant to this subsection shall be a matter of public record.

(d) Where the board has reasonable cause to
believe that a licensee is or may be unable to practice medicine with
reasonable skill and safety to protect patients, the board may order the
licensee to submit to a mental or physical examination or any combination
thereof, by a licensed practitioner approved by the board, at the licensee's
expense. The examination may include biological fluid testing and other
testing known to detect the presence of alcohol or other drugs. In addition:

(1) Any licensee shall be deemed to have consented to
submit to a mental or physical examination when so directed by the board and to
have waived all objection to the use or referral of information by the board to
determine whether the licensee is able to practice medicine with reasonable
skill and safety to protect patients;

(2) The board may seek to enforce an order directing
a licensee to submit to a mental or physical examination in the circuit court
in the county in which the licensee resides;

(3) Failure of a licensee to submit to an examination
ordered under this subsection shall constitute grounds for summary suspension
of the licensee's license; and

(4) The board may take any action authorized under
this chapter based on information obtained under this subsection.

(e) Any person licensed by the board,
including a physician, surgeon, or physician assistant, who provides
information to the board indicating that a board licensee may be guilty of
unprofessional conduct or may be impaired because of drug or alcohol abuse or
mental illness shall not be liable for any damages in any civil action based on
the communication. The immunity afforded by this section shall be in addition
to any immunity afforded by section 663-1.7, if applicable, and shall not be
construed to affect the availability of any absolute privilege under sections
663-1.7 and 671D-10. [L 1896, c 60, §7; am L 1917, c 116, §1; RL 1925, §1029;
am L 1925, c 26, §5; RL 1935, §1208; am L 1939, c 183, pt of §1; am L 1941, c
4, §2; RL 1945, §2507; am L 1947, c 201, pt of §1; am L 1949, c 108, §1; RL
1955, §64-7; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; am L 1965, c 218, §6; HRS §453-8; am L
1969, c 257, §6; am L 1974, c 205, §2(15); am L 1976, c 219, §10; am L 1977, c
167, §13; am L 1982, c 227, §3; am L 1983, c 22, §1 and c 92, pt of §1(5); am L
1984, c 16, §1; am L 1986, c 144, §2; am L 1987, c 76, §1; am L 1988, c 110,
§6; am L 1989, c 181, §4; am L 1992, c 177, §3 and c 202, §101; am L 2000, c
228, §3; am L 2008, c 5, §11; am L 2013, c 219, §2; am L 2016, c 38, §7]

Attorney General Opinions

Giving insufficient direction or failure to indicate status
of an unlicensed physician may subject a licensed physician to license
revocation. Att. Gen. Op. 63-55.

Case Notes

"Gross carelessness" and "manifest
incapacity" defined. 52 F.2d 411 (1931).

Constitutional. 31 H. 625 (1930), aff'd 52 F.2d 411 (1931).

One year suspension of appellant's license to practice
medicine by board of medical examiners after appellant was convicted of
attempted first degree sexual abuse and kidnapping did not amount to a
violation of double jeopardy clause of Fifth Amendment to U.S. Constitution;
appellant had been convicted of a penal offense within meaning of subsection
(a)(12); board did not err in finding that appellant violated subsection
(a)(12). 78 H. 21, 889 P.2d 705 (1995).

Cited: 15 H. 273, 274 (1903).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next